Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-909 Improper distribution;
liability of distributee. Unless the distribution or payment no longer can
be questioned because of adjudication, estoppel, or limitation, a distributee
of property improperly distributed or paid, or a claimant who was improperly
paid, is liable to return the property improperly received and its income since
distribution if the distributee or claimant has the property. If the
distributee or claimant does not have the property, then the distributee or
claimant is liable to return the value as of the date of disposition of the
property improperly received and its income and gain received by that person.
[L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next